Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20219-1105
Commission; administer act.

For purposes of providing the necessary licensing and regulation of the operation of games of chance by authorized gaming operators within licensed racetrack enclosures pursuant to the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, the commission shall administer the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act. The commission shall have full jurisdiction over and shall supervise all gaming operations pursuant to the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act.

Initiative Law 2020, No. 430, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 29.
May 26, 2021